Arkansas, session 2025, HB1511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-16-705, concerning the subpoena power of
the Attorney General, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(e)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (e)(2) of this section, a
recipient of a subpoena under subsection (a) of this section shall not
disclose to a third party, except the recipient's attorney, the existence of
the:
(A) Subpoena; or
(B) Investigation for which the subpoena is issued.
(2) A recipient of a subpoena under subsection (a) of this
section may disclose the information under subdivision (e)(1) of this section
with written permission from the Attorney General.




*LGL093*
02/17/2025 3:00:42 PM LGL093